Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1436.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7102(a.1)(2) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and paragraph (3) is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 7102. Comparative negligence.* * *(a.1) Recovery against joint defendant; contribution.--* * *(2) Except as set forth in paragraph (3), if a plaintiff is found to be comparatively negligent, a defendant's liability shall be several and not joint, and the court shall enter a separate and several judgment in favor of the plaintiff and against each defendant for the apportioned amount of that defendant's liability.12345678910111213141516171819 (3) A defendant's liability in any of the following actions shall be joint and several, and the court shall enter a joint and several judgment in favor of the plaintiff and against the defendant for the total dollar amount awarded as damages:* * *(vi) Where the defendant has been held liable for some portion of the total liability apportioned to all parties and the plaintiff is not found to be comparatively negligent.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1436PN1675 - 2 - 123456789101112